Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1408.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of education; schools; trees; report; exemption A. The sum of $400,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education to distribute to public schools to plant low-biogenic volatile organic compound-emitting trees on school campuses that are appropriate to each school's respective climate. B. Until December 31, 2026, the department shall distribute the monies appropriated pursuant to this section on a first-come, first-served basis only to public schools in this state at which seventy-five percent or more of the students are eligible for free or reduced-price lunches under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793).  If any monies remain undistributed from and after December 31, 2026, the department shall distribute the remaining monies on a first-come, first-served basis to public schools in this state. C. The department may require each public school that receives monies pursuant to this section to issue a report regarding the school's use of monies received.  A public school that receives monies pursuant to this section may partner with nonprofit organizations to plant the trees on the school's campus. D. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.